Washington statutes.
RCW 15.17.150

Inspections and certifications—Fees adopted by rule—Failure to pay.

The director shall adopt rules establishing the necessary fees to recover the costs of providing inspection and/or certification or other requested services.

(1) The fees are due and payable upon billing.

(2) A late fee of one and one-half percent per month on the unpaid balance shall be assessed against persons more than thirty days in arrears.

(3) In addition to other penalties, the director may refuse to perform any inspection or certification service provided under this chapter for any person in arrears unless the person makes payment in full prior to such inspection or certification service.

(4) The director may refuse to perform inspection or certification service for any person who has failed to pay assessments required by law to any agricultural commodity commission.

[ 1998 c 154 s 10; 1963 c 122 s 15.]